Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-110.6 of Title 47, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Whenever an applicant for a driver license or state-issued


identification card presents an original or certified birth


certificate copy as proof of identity, Service Oklahoma shall query


the Electronic Verification of Vital Events (EVVE) system prior to


issuance of a new driver license or state-issued identification


card, a renewal of a driver license or state-issued identification


card, or an application for a lost or destroyed driver license or


state-issued identification card. In the event that the EVVE system

Req. No. 2394 Page 1


is unable to verify the original or certified birth certificate copy


presented for any reason, the EVVE system shall provide a question-


and-answer-based verification process that, with near certainty, can


establish the validity of the professed identity of the applicant.


B. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules for the provisions


provided for in this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2394 MSBB 12/10/2025 1:15:00 PM































Req. No. 2394 Page 2